Utah statutes.
76-2-101.   Requirements of criminal conduct and criminal responsibility.

(1) (a)  A person is not guilty of an offense unless the person's conduct is prohibited by law; and

(b) (i)  the person acts intentionally, knowingly, recklessly, with criminal negligence, or with a mental state otherwise specified in the statute defining the offense, as the definition of the offense requires; or

(ii)  the person's acts constitute an offense involving strict liability.

(2)  These standards of criminal responsibility do not apply to the violations set forth in Title 41, Chapter 6a, Traffic Code, unless specifically provided by law.



Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

